Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
CHAPTER 175 Turnpike Authority
175.505.
Debt payment acceleration fund — Revenue source — Use to accelerate payment of turnpike authority debt.

There is hereby created a fund in the road fund of the Commonwealth of Kentucky entitled the debt payment acceleration fund. The fund shall consist of twenty percent (20%) of the revenues to the state road fund provided by the adjustments in KRS 138.220(2) excluding the provisions of KRS

177.320

and

177.365

. Annually the Transportation Cabinet shall use the funds generated to accelerate the payment of debt service including principal and interest, over and above the annual debt service payments appropriated for each fiscal year, for all bonds issued and any refinancings thereof by the Kentucky Turnpike Authority. The Transportation Cabinet shall notify the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue by January 1 of each fiscal year of the debt payments which are to or have been accelerated in the fiscal year. In the event that, due to bond market conditions, the terms of the bonds issued or other factors, the Transportation Cabinet is unable to accelerate debt service payments, the Transportation Cabinet shall provide documentation to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue that such acceleration is not possible and the reasons therefor. In such an event, the funds not available for debt acceleration shall be placed in a special escrow account in the Transportation Cabinet. Such funds shall not be expended for any of the lawful purposes of the Transportation Cabinet but shall be held in the escrow account until such time as the debt acceleration described by this section is possible. The Transportation Cabinet shall invest the funds allocated to the escrow account and any funds generated from these investments shall remain in the escrow account. Any funds remaining in the escrow account at the close of the fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year for use as provided in this section. In the event that all principal and interest outstanding on any bonds issued or any refinancing thereof by the turnpike authority has been paid, the Transportation Cabinet shall so report. In that event, any funds remaining in the escrow account shall remain in the fund until such time as the funds are appropriated by the General Assembly for any of the lawful purposes of the Transportation Cabinet.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 174, § 11, effective July 1, 1986.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See Transportation Cabinet Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 214, Pt. I, A, 3, (2) at 2018.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The secretary of transportation acted within his authority in curtailing the allotment of funds to the debt payment acceleration fund.

OAG 92-7

.

175.510.
Revenue bonds are not debt of Commonwealth.

Revenue bonds issued by the authority under the provisions of this chapter shall not be deemed to constitute a debt of the department or of the Commonwealth or of any political subdivision thereof, or a pledge of the faith and credit of the department or of the Commonwealth or of any such political subdivision, but such bonds shall be payable solely from the funds provided therefor under the provisions of this chapter. All such revenue bonds shall contain on the face thereof a statement to the effect that neither the Commonwealth nor the authority shall be obligated to pay the same or the interest thereon except from revenues of the turnpike project for which they are issued, including rentals under a lease of such project to the Department of Highways of the Commonwealth for a biennium and subject to renewal for successive bienniums; and that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the Commonwealth or of any political subdivision thereof is pledged to the payment of the principal of or the interest on such bonds.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 173, § 11, effective March 25, 1960.

175.520.
Tolls for use of turnpikes — Contracts for utility and service facilities — Disposition of toll revenues.

The authority, while having the right to control tolls under this chapter or any lease, and the department, while having such right under this chapter or any such lease, are hereby authorized to fix, revise, charge, and collect tolls for the use of each turnpike project and the different parts or sections thereof.

The authority, with the approval of the department, is hereby authorized to contract with any person, partnership, association, or corporation desiring the use of any part of a project, including the right-of-way adjoining the paved portion, for placing thereon telephone, telegraph, electric light, or power lines; service stations, garages, stores, hotels, motels, and restaurants; or for any other purpose except for tracks for railroad or railway use, and to fix the terms, conditions, rents, and rates of charges for such use. A sufficient number of service stations shall be authorized to be established in each service area along any such turnpike to permit reasonable competition by private business in the public interest.

During any period when tolls are under the control of the authority, such tolls shall be so fixed and adjusted in respect of the aggregate of tolls from the turnpike project or projects in connection with which the bonds of any issue shall have been issued under the provisions of this chapter as to provide funds sufficient, with any other available funds, to pay:

The cost of maintaining, repairing and operating such turnpike project or projects, unless such cost or any part thereof is being paid by the department as authorized in this chapter; and

The principal of and the interest on such bonds as the same shall become due and payable, and to create reserves for such purposes.

Such tolls shall not be subject to supervision or regulation by any other department, commission, board, bureau, or agency of the Commonwealth. The tolls and all other revenues derived from the turnpike project or projects in connection with which the bonds of any issue shall have been issued, except such part thereof as may be necessary to pay such cost of maintenance, repair, and operation and to provide such reserves therefor as may be provided for in the proceedings authorizing the issuance of such bonds or the trust indenture securing the same, shall be set aside in a sinking fund or funds which are hereby pledged to and charged with the payment of the principal of and the interest on such bonds as the same shall become due and the redemption price or the purchase price of bonds retired by call or purchase as therein provided. Such pledge shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge is made; the tolls or other revenues or other moneys so pledged and thereafter received by the authority shall immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act; and the lien of any such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the authority, irrespective of whether such parties have notice thereof. Neither the proceedings nor any trust indenture by which a pledge is created need be filed or recorded except in the records of the authority and the department. The use and disposition of moneys to the credit of any such sinking fund shall be subject to the provisions of the proceedings authorizing the issuance of such bonds or of such trust indenture. Except as may otherwise be provided in such proceedings or in such trust indenture, any such sinking fund shall be a fund for all bonds provided to be payable therefrom without distinction or priority of one (1) over another.

Notwithstanding any of the foregoing provisions of this section, the department may, by separate proceedings ancillary to the proceedings of the authority authorizing the issuance of revenue bonds or revenue refunding bonds under the provisions of this chapter, covenant to pay all or any part of the cost of maintaining, repairing, and operating any project constructed under the provisions of this chapter, and the department may, in such proceedings, covenant to make up all or any part of any deficiency in the fund or funds pledged to and charged with the payment of the principal of and the interest on such bonds from any funds or tax revenues available for general purposes of the department and not required by law to be devoted to some other purpose, and, inasmuch as such project will have been constructed by agreement with the department for the use and benefit of the Commonwealth and will eventually become the property of the Commonwealth, any such covenant shall have the force of contract between the Commonwealth and the holders of such revenue bonds or revenue refunding bonds.

Notwithstanding any of the foregoing provisions of this section, the authority may, in the proceedings authorizing the issuance of revenue bonds or revenue refunding bonds for any turnpike project or projects under the provisions of this chapter or in the trust agreement securing such bonds, pledge to the payment of such bonds all motor fuel taxes and surtaxes collected by the Commonwealth on gasoline and other motor fuels consumed on such project or projects (except the two-sevenths (2/7) of said motor fuel taxes provided by KRS

138.220

to be set aside for the construction, reconstruction and maintenance of rural and secondary roads) and paid over to the authority by the department as revenues of such project or projects, and covenant to deposit such motor fuel taxes from time to time in the sinking fund or funds pledged to the payment of such bonds. In determining the amount of motor fuel consumed on any turnpike project the department shall divide the total miles traveled on such project by passenger automobiles, single unit trucks, and semitrailer trucks and buses as determined by the department by the average number of miles per gallon of motor fuel consumed by each of those classes of motor vehicle on the following basis:

Passenger automobiles15 miles per gallon

Single unit trucks10 miles per gallon

Semitrailer trucks and buses5 miles per gallon

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 173, § 12, effective March 25, 1960; 1988, ch. 270, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1996, ch. 249, § 2, effective July 15, 1996.

175.525.
Toll-road identification card — Exemptions from tolls.

The authority or the cabinet shall establish by administrative regulation promulgated pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A a toll-road identification card to be provided to paying and nonpaying users of toll facilities. The toll-road identification cards shall be issued through an application process. A fee that shall not exceed five dollars ($5) may be established for the issuance of each card.

Upon application, nonpaying accounts shall be established for:

State police, local police, and fire department vehicles while the vehicles are being operated in an official capacity on a turnpike project;

Emergency vehicles operated by an ambulance service while the vehicles are being operated in an official capacity, in both emergency and nonemergency situations on a turnpike project;

Funeral processions on turnpike projects; and

School district vehicles while the vehicles are being operated in an official capacity on turnpike projects.

To receive the exemption contained in subsection (2) of this section, an ambulance service shall be licensed by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 249, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 426, § 122, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 143, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 130, § 1, effective June 20, 2005.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/20/2005).
This section was amended by 2005 Ky. Acts chs. 99 and 130, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

175.530.
Trust indenture to secure bonds — Rights and remedies of bondholders.

In the discretion of the authority, any bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter may be secured by a trust indenture by and between the authority and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or without the Commonwealth. Such trust indenture or the proceedings providing for the issuance of such bonds may pledge or assign the tolls and other revenues to be received, but shall not convey or mortgage any turnpike project or any part thereof. Such trust indenture or proceedings may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including covenants setting forth the duties of the authority in relation to the acquisition of property and the construction, improvement, maintenance, repair, operation and insurance of the turnpike project or projects in connection with which such bonds shall have been authorized, the rates of toll or the rentals to be charged, and the custody, safeguarding and application of all moneys. It shall be lawful for any bank or trust company incorporated under the laws of the Commonwealth which may act as depository of the proceeds of bonds or of revenues to furnish such indemnifying bonds or to pledge such securities as may be required by the authority. Any such trust indenture may set forth the rights and remedies of the bondholders and of the trustee, and may restrict the individual right of action by bondholders. In addition to the foregoing, any such trust indenture or proceedings may contain such other provisions as the authority may deem reasonable and proper for the security of the bondholders. All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of such trust indenture or proceedings may be treated as a part of the cost of the operation of the turnpike project or projects.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 173, § 13, effective March 25, 1960.

175.540.
Trust funds.

All moneys received pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, whether as proceeds from the sale of bonds or as revenues, shall be deemed to be trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in this chapter. The proceedings or the trust indenture shall provide that any officer with whom, or any bank or trust company with which, such moneys shall be deposited shall act as trustee of such moneys and shall hold and apply the same for the purposes hereof, subject to such regulations as this chapter and such proceedings or trust indenture may provide.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 173, § 13, effective March 25, 1960.

175.550.
Remedies of bondholders.

Any holder of bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter or any of the coupons appertaining thereto, and the trustee under any trust indenture, except to the extent the rights herein given may be restricted by such trust indenture, may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus or other proceedings, protect and enforce any and all rights under the laws of the Commonwealth or granted under this chapter or under such trust indenture or the proceedings authorizing the issuance of such bonds, and may enforce and compel the performance of all duties required by this chapter or by such trust indenture or proceedings to be performed by the authority or by any officer or employees thereof, including the fixing, charging and collecting of tolls.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 173, § 15, effective March 25, 1960.

175.560.
Turnpike properties and bonds are tax-exempt.

The exercise of the powers granted by this chapter will be in all respects for the benefit of the people of the Commonwealth, for the increase of their commerce and prosperity, and for the improvement of their health and living conditions, and as the operation and maintenance of a turnpike project or projects by the authority will constitute the performance of essential governmental functions, the authority shall not be required to pay any taxes or assessments upon any turnpike project or any property acquired or used by the authority under the provisions of this chapter or upon the income therefrom, and the bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter, their transfer and the income therefrom (including any profit made on the sale thereof) shall at all times be free from taxation within the Commonwealth.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 173, § 16, effective March 25, 1960.

175.570.
Status of turnpike bonds as investments.

Bonds issued by the authority under the provisions of this chapter are hereby made securities in which all public officers and public bodies, agencies and instrumentalities of the Commonwealth and its political subdivisions, all insurance companies, trust companies, banking associations, investment companies, executors, administrators, trustees and other fiduciaries, and all other persons whatsoever who are now or may hereafter be authorized to invest in bonds or other obligations of a similar nature may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them. Such bonds are hereby made securities which may properly and legally be deposited with and received by any state or municipal officer or any agency or political subdivision of the Commonwealth for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or other obligations of the Commonwealth is now or may hereafter be authorized by law.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 173, § 17, effective March 25, 1960.

175.580.
Maintenance of turnpike — Restoration of private property — Donation of property by county or city — Annual report of turnpike activities — Audits — Prohibition of interest of department or authority personnel.

Except as otherwise provided in the agreement or lease relating thereto, each turnpike project when constructed and opened to traffic shall be maintained and kept in good condition and repair by the department under the terms and provisions of the agreement or lease, and shall be operated and maintained by such force of tolltakers, and other operating and maintenance employees, as the department may in its discretion employ, and the department shall not be reimbursed for the cost thereof unless expressly otherwise provided in the agreement or lease.

All private property damaged or destroyed in carrying out the powers granted by this chapter shall be restored or repaired and placed in its original condition as nearly as practicable or adequate compensation made therefor out of funds provided under the authority of this chapter.

All counties, cities, towns and other political subdivisions and all public agencies and commissions of the Commonwealth, notwithstanding any contrary provision of law, may lease, lend, grant or convey to the authority at its request, upon such terms and conditions as the proper authorities of the counties, cities, towns, political subdivisions, agencies or commissions of the Commonwealth deem reasonable and fair and without the necessity for any advertisement, order of court or other action or formality, other than the regular and formal action of the authorities concerned, any real property which is necessary or convenient to the effectuation of the authorized purposes of the authority, including public roads and other real property already devoted to public use.

On or before January 30 in each year the authority shall make an annual report of its activities for the preceding year to the Governor and to the General Assembly. Each such report shall set forth a complete operating and financial statement covering its operations during the year. The authority shall cause an audit of its books and accounts to be made at least once in each year by certified public accountants and the cost thereof may be treated as a part of the cost of construction or operation of the project. Such audits are public records within meaning of KRS 61.870(2).

No officer or employee of the authority or of the department shall have any interest, direct or indirect, in the sale or purchase of any bonds authorized by this chapter. Violation of this provision shall be punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, or both.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 173, § 18; 1966, ch. 255, § 161; 1980, ch. 188, § 131, effective July 15, 1980.

175.590.
Acquisition of property — Condemnation — Possession — Special provisions for condemning railroad property.

The authority is hereby authorized and empowered to acquire by purchase, whenever it shall deem such purchase expedient, solely from funds provided pursuant to this chapter, such lands, structures, property, rights, rights of way, franchises, easements and other interests in lands, including lands lying under water and riparian rights, which are located within the Commonwealth, as it may deem necessary or convenient for the construction and operation of any project, upon such terms and at such prices as may be considered by it to be reasonable and can be agreed upon between it and the owner thereof, and to take title thereto in the name of the authority.

Whenever a reasonable price cannot be agreed upon, or whenever the owner is legally incapacitated or is absent, unknown or unable to convey valid title, the authority is hereby authorized and empowered to acquire by condemnation or by the exercise of the power of eminent domain any lands, property, rights, rights of way, franchises, easements and other property, including public lands, parks, playgrounds, reservations, highways or parkways, or parts thereof or rights therein, of any person, copartnership, association, railroad, public service, public utility or other corporation, or municipality or political subdivision, deemed necessary or convenient for the construction or the efficient operation of any project or necessary in the restoration of public or private property damaged or destroyed. Any such proceedings shall be conducted, and the compensation to be paid shall be ascertained and paid, in the manner provided by the Constitution and laws of the Commonwealth then applicable which relate to condemnation or to the exercise of the power of eminent domain by the department. Title to any property acquired by the authority shall be taken in the name of the authority. In any condemnation proceedings the court having jurisdiction of the suit, action or proceeding may make such orders as may be just to the authority and to the owners of the property to be condemned and may require an undertaking or other security to secure such owners against any loss or damage by reason of the failure of the authority to accept and pay for the property, but neither such undertaking or security nor any act or obligation of the authority shall impose any liability upon the Commonwealth except as may be paid from the funds provided under this chapter.

If the owner, lessee or occupier of any property to be condemned shall refuse to remove his personal property therefrom or give up his possession thereof, the authority may proceed to obtain possession in any manner now or hereafter provided by law.

With respect to any railroad property or right of way upon which railroad tracks are located, any powers of condemnation or of eminent domain may be exercised to acquire only an easement interest therein which shall be located either sufficiently far above or sufficiently far below the grade of any railroad track or tracks upon such railroad property so that neither the proposed project nor any part thereof, including any bridges, abutments, columns, supporting structures and appurtenances, nor any traffic upon it, shall interfere in any manner with the use, operation or maintenance of the trains, tracks, works or appurtenances or other property of the railroad nor endanger the movement of the trains or traffic upon the tracks of the railroad. Prior to the institution of condemnation proceedings for such easement over or under such railroad property or right of way, plans and specifications of the proposed project showing compliance with the above mentioned above or below grade requirements and showing sufficient and safe plans and specifications of such overhead or undergrade structure and appurtenances shall be submitted to the railroad for examination and approval. If the railroad fails or refuses within thirty (30) days to approve the plans and specifications so submitted, the matter shall be submitted to the Public Service Commission of Kentucky whose decision arrived at after due consideration in accordance with its usual procedure, shall be final as to the sufficiency and safety of such plans and specifications and as to such elevations or distances above or below the tracks. Said overhead or undergrade structure and appurtenances shall be constructed only in accordance with such plans and specifications and in accordance with such elevations or distances above or below the tracks so approved by the railroad or the Public Service Commission as the case may be. A copy of the plans and specifications approved by the railroad or the Public Service Commission shall be filed as an exhibit with the petition for condemnation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 173, § 19.

175.600.
Refunding bonds, issued when — Temporary investments — Agreements. [Repealed.]

175.605.
Refunding bonds — Purposes — Factors to be taken into account — Investment of proceeds — Agreements and leases — Securing bonds.

The authority is hereby authorized to provide for the issuance of its turnpike revenue refunding bonds for any combination of the following purposes:

The refunding of any bonds then outstanding, whether an entire issue or series, or one or more issues or series, or any portions or parts of any issue or series, which shall have been issued under the provisions of this chapter;

For such refunding and for the additional purpose of financing, in whole or in part, improvements, extensions, enlargements or completion of any turnpike project or projects in connection with which the bonds to be refunded shall have been issued;

For such refunding and to pay all or any part of the costs of any new or additional turnpike project or projects.

In determining the principal amount of any such turnpike revenue refunding bonds to be issued for the purpose of refunding any bonds outstanding pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, the authority may take into account the following factors:

The principal amount of all outstanding bonds to be redeemed and refunded, as of the established date of redemption thereof;

The total amount of any redemption premium incident to redemption of such outstanding bonds to be refunded;

The total amount of any interest accrued or to accrue to the date or dates of redemption of such outstanding bonds to be refunded;

Any and all costs or expenses incident to such refunding;

Such amount, if any, as may be anticipated with certainty to be realized upon the investment of the bond proceeds of turnpike revenue refunding bonds from the date of such refunding bonds to the date or dates of redemption of outstanding bonds to be refunded; and

Any amount or amounts which may have been accrued or accumulated as a reserve or reserves with reference to the outstanding bonds to be refunded, and any earnings realized, or anticipated with certainty to be realized therefrom, to the extent that such reserve or reserves may be so applied as provided by the proceedings authorizing the outstanding bonds to be refunded.

The issuance of such turnpike revenue refunding bonds, the maturities and other details thereof, the rights of the holders thereof, and the rights, duties and obligations of the authority in respect of the same, shall be governed by the provisions of this chapter, insofar as the same may be applicable, and may in harmony therewith be adjusted and modified to conform to the facts and circumstances prevailing in each instance of issuance of such turnpike revenue refunding bonds.

With reference to the investment of the proceeds of any such turnpike revenue refunding bonds, the authority shall not authorize or anticipate investment earnings exceeding such as are authorized or permitted under prevailing federal laws, regulations and administrative rulings relating to arbitrage bonds.

Pending application of the proceeds of such turnpike revenue refunding bonds (together with any other funds available for application to refunding purposes, if so provided or permitted in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such turnpike revenue refunding bonds, or in the trust indenture securing the same), to the purposes hereinabove authorized and permitted, such refunding bond proceeds and such other available funds, if any, may be invested in direct obligation of, or obligations the principal of and the interest on which are unconditionally guaranteed by, the United States of America, or in United States government agency obligations, which shall mature, or which shall be subject to redemption by the holder thereof at the option of such holder, not later than the respective date or dates when such proceeds, together with the interest accruing thereon, will be required for the refunding purposes intended and authorized; or, in lieu of such investments, all or any part of such refunding bond proceeds may be placed in interest-bearing time deposits, or other similar arrangements may be made with regard thereto which will assure that such refunding bond proceeds, together with the interest accruing thereon, will be available when required for the refunding purposes intended and authorized; provided, however, that such time deposits shall be made in a bank or banks possessing capital and surplus, in each case, of not less than one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000), or, if any such deposit be made in any bank having a combined capital and surplus of less than said amount, the deposit shall be secured by obligations such as those permitted herein for investment for all amounts in excess of twenty-five percent (25%) of the combined capital and surplus of such bank.

In connection with or incident to the issuance of the authority’s turnpike revenue refunding bonds for any of the purposes authorized in this section, the authority and the department are authorized to make one or more written agreements or supplemental agreements with regard to any one or more of the matters and things set forth in KRS

175.460

, and pursuant thereto the authority and the department are authorized and empowered to enter into one or more leases, or supplemental leases, pursuant thereto; and any such leases or supplemental leases may contain, in substance, any of the provisions set forth in KRS

175.470

, with modifications conforming to the provisions of such agreements or supplemental agreements, and with such other provisions not inconsistent with KRS

175.470

as the authority and the department may deem appropriate and desirable. Provided, however, that such agreements may, by their terms provide that any such leases, or supplemental leases, and the rental schedule or schedules with reference thereto, shall be and become effective only upon the redemption of the outstanding bonds for the refunding of which such turnpike revenue refunding bonds are issued.

Any such turnpike revenue refunding bonds issued by the authority may be secured, until the date or dates established for the redemption of the outstanding bonds being refunded, solely, as to both principal and interest, by a pledge of and lien upon the obligations acquired by the application of the proceeds of such turnpike revenue refunding bonds, and the income thereon, and in such case shall not be secured by any trust indenture, lease agreement, resolution, or other contractual arrangement securing the outstanding bonds to be refunded by such turnpike revenue refunding bonds; provided, however, that any authorizing proceedings incident to such turnpike revenue refunding bonds may provide that as of the effective date of such refunding, the refunding bonds shall be substituted for the outstanding bonds being refunded, and shall be secured as to payment of principal and interest identically as in the case of the outstanding bonds being refunded, subject to the provisions, requirements and conditions precedent established by the authority incident to the issuance of the outstanding bonds being refunded.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 371, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(1).

175.610.
Transfer of turnpike to highway system after retirement of bonds.

Except as hereinafter provided in this section, when all bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter in connection with any turnpike project or projects and the interest thereon shall have been paid or a sufficient amount for the payment of all such bonds and the interest thereon to the maturity thereof shall have been set aside in trust for the benefit of the bondholders, such project or projects, if then in good condition and repair, shall be conveyed by the authority to the Commonwealth and shall become part of the state highway system and shall thereafter be maintained by the department free of tolls; provided, however, that the department may, in any proceedings or trust indenture authorizing or securing bonds under the provisions of this chapter, provide for combining for financing purposes any two (2) or more turnpike projects theretofore constructed or thereafter to be constructed, and for the reimposition or continuance of tolls on each such turnpike project until all such bonds and the interest thereon shall have been paid or a sufficient amount for such purposes shall have been set aside in trust for the benefit of the bondholders.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 173, § 21, effective March 25, 1960.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Under this section, when the bonds and interest are completely paid, as relates to the Mountain Parkway and Mountain Parkway Extension, if those roads are found by the Transportation Cabinet to be in good condition and repair, the Turnpike Authority must then convey the toll roads to the commonwealth, and they shall become part of the State Highway System and shall thereafter be maintained by the Transportation Cabinet free of tolls. However, if, at the time the bonds and interest are fully paid, the Transportation Cabinet finds that the toll roads are not in good condition and repair, the tolls should be retained for a reasonable period, during which time the Cabinet will restore the toll roads to good condition and repair.

OAG 85-4

.

175.620.
Preliminary expenses of turnpike project.

The department is hereby authorized in its discretion to expend such moneys as may be necessary for the study of any turnpike project or projects and to use its engineering and other forces and employ consulting engineers and traffic engineers for the purpose of effecting such study, and to pay for such additional engineering and traffic and other expert studies as it may deem expedient. All such expenses incurred by the department prior to the issuance of turnpike revenue bonds under the provisions of this chapter shall be paid by the department and charged to the appropriate turnpike project or projects, and the department shall keep proper records and accounts showing each amount so charged. Upon the sale of turnpike revenue bonds of the authority for any turnpike project or projects, the funds so expended by the department in connection with such project or projects may be reimbursed by the authority to the department from the proceeds of such bonds if provision to that effect is made in the proceedings or trust indenture authorizing and securing such bonds.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 173, § 22, effective March 25, 1960.

175.630.
Additional and alternative nature of chapter.

This chapter shall be deemed to provide an additional and alternative method for the doing of the things authorized thereby, and shall be regarded as supplemental and additional to powers conferred by other laws, and shall not be regarded as in derogation of any powers now existing; provided, however, that the issuance of turnpike revenue bonds or turnpike revenue refunding bonds by the authority under the provisions of this chapter need not comply with the requirements of any other law applicable to the issuance of bonds.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 173, § 23, effective March 25, 1960.